Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 1. In General

§ 35-2-301.
Short title.

This act [§§

35-2-301

through

35-2-345

] may be cited as the “State Hospital and Medical Facilities Survey and Construction Act.”

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 159, § 1; 1957, ch. 196, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-98.

Cross references. —

As to public property and contracts generally, see §§

16-6-101

to

16-6-118

and

16-6-119

to

16-6-121

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of blood shield statutes, 75 ALR5th 229.

§ 35-2-302.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

35-2-301

through

35-2-345

]:

“Commissioner” means the director of the state department of health. The director of the state department of health shall be, ex officio, the commissioner;

“The federal act” means title VI of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. § 291 et seq.) as is now and as may hereafter be amended;

“The surgeon general” means the surgeon general of the public health service of the United States;

“Hospital” includes public health centers and general, tuberculosis, mental, chronic disease, and other types of hospitals, and related facilities, such as laboratories, outpatient departments, nurses’ home and training facilities, and central service facilities operated in connection with hospitals, but does not include any hospital furnishing primarily domiciliary care;

“Public health center” means a publicly owned facility for the provision of public health services, including related facilities such as laboratories, clinics and administrative offices operated in connection with public health centers;

“Nonprofit hospital” means any hospital or medical facility owned and operated by a corporation or association, no part of the net earnings of which inures, or may lawfully inure, to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual;

“Medical facilities” means diagnostic or diagnostic and treatment centers, rehabilitation facilities and nursing homes as those terms are defined in the federal act and such other medical facilities for which federal aid may be authorized under the federal act.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 159, § 2; 1957, ch. 196, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 35-99; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Medical malpractice: Who are “health care providers,” or the like, whose actions fall within statutes specifically governing actions and damages for medical malpractice, 12 ALR5th 1.

§ 35-2-303.
Department of health; sole agency for making an inventory and developing and administering state plan.

The department of health shall constitute the sole agency of the state for the purpose of:

Making an inventory of existing hospitals and medical facilities, surveying the need for construction of hospitals and medical facilities, and developing a program of hospital construction as provided in W.S.

35-2-320

through

35-2-322

; and

Developing and administering a state plan for the construction of public and other nonprofit hospitals and medical facilities as provided in W.S.

35-2-340

through

35-2-345

.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 159, § 3; 1957, ch. 196, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 35-100; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-2-304.
Powers and duties of commissioner enumerated.

In carrying out the purposes of the act [§§

35-2-301

through

35-2-345

], the commissioner is authorized and directed:

To require such reports, make such inspections and investigations and prescribe such regulations as he deems necessary;

To provide such methods of administration, appoint personnel and take such other action as may be necessary to comply with the requirements of the federal act and the regulations thereunder;

To procure the temporary or intermittent services of experts or consultants or organizations thereof, by contract, when such services are to be performed on a part-time or fee-for-service basis and do not involve the performance of administrative duties;

To the extent that he considers desirable to effectuate the purposes of this act [§§

35-2-301

through

35-2-345

], to enter into agreements for the utilization of the facilities and services of other departments, agencies, and institutions, public or private;

To accept on behalf of the state and to deposit with the state treasurer any grant, gift or contribution made to assist in meeting the cost of carrying out the purposes of this act, and to expend the same for such purposes;

As required by W.S.

9-2-1014

, to report to the governor concerning activities and expenditures and recommendations for such additional legislation as the commissioner considers appropriate to furnish adequate hospital, clinic, and similar facilities to the people of this state.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 159, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 35-101; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “federal act.” —

For the definition of “federal act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-2-302(a)(ii).

§ 35-2-305.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1947, ch. 159, § 5, related to advisory councils.

§ 35-2-306.
Disbursement of funds.

All claims against funds made available for the administration of this act [§§

35-2-301

through

35-2-345

] shall be submitted, audited, allowed and paid in the same manner as other claims against the state and in addition thereto shall be approved by the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 159, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 35-103.

Cross references. —

As to claims against state, see §

9-1-404

.

Severability. —

Section 17, ch. 159, Laws 1947, reads: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance shall be held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect the provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the act are declared to be severable.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 18, ch. 159, Laws 1947, repealed all acts or parts of acts inconsistent with that act.